el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους δολώματος: Γίγας; Φυσικό μέγεθος; Magnum; Mini; Υπερμεγέθες; Κάλτσα; Κανονικό; Super Magnum; Άλλο
fi: Houkutuslinnun kokoluokka: Jättiläinen; Luonnollisen kokoinen; Magnum; Mini; Ylisuuri; Sukka; Standardi; Super Magnum; Muu
nb: Lokkefugl størrelsesklasse: Kjempe; Naturlig størrelse; Magnum; Mini; Overdimensjonert; Sokk; Standard; Super Magnum; Annet
da: Lokkemidlets størrelsesklasse: Kæmpe; Naturlig størrelse; Magnum; Mini; Overstørrelse; Sok; Standard; Super magnum; Andet
vi: Kích thước mồi nhử: Khổng lồ; Kích thước thật; Lớn (Magnum); Nhỏ; Ngoại cỡ; Túi gió; Tiêu chuẩn; Siêu lớn (Super Magnum); Khác
fr: Classe de taille du leurre: Géant; Grandeur nature; Magnum; Mini; Surdimensionné; Chaussette; Standard; Super Magnum; Autre
es: Clase de talla del señuelo: Gigante; Tamaño real; Magnum; Mini; Extragrande; Manga; Estándar; Súper Magnum; Otro
sl-SI: Razred velikosti vabe: Velikansko; Naravna velikost; Magnum; Mini; Preveliko; Nogavica; Standardno; Super Magnum; Drugo
de: Größenklasse des Lockvogels: Giant; Lebensgroß; Magnum; Mini; Oversize; Windsack; Standard; Super Magnum; Sonstige
pt-PT: Classe de tamanho de isco: Gigante; Tamanho real; Magnum; Mini; Tamanho grande; Manga; Padrão; Super Magnum; Outro
nl: Lokaas grootte klasse: Giant; Levensgroot; Magnum; Mini; Oversized; Sok; Standaard; Super Magnum; Overige
sv: Lockbete storlek klass: Jätte; Naturlig storlek; Magnum; Mini; Överdimensionerad; Vindstrut; Standard; Super Magnum; Övrigt
zh-TW: 誘餌尺寸等級: 巨大款; 實際比例; 大型款; 迷你款; 特大款; 襪狀型; 標準款; 超大型款; 其他
bg-BG: Клас на размера на примамката: Гигантска; Реален размер; Магнум; Мини; Увеличен размер; Чорап; Стандартна; Супер Магнум; Друго
ro-RO: Clasa de dimensiuni pentru momeală: Uriaș; Mărime naturală; Magnum; Mini; Supradimensionat; Ciorap; Standard; Super Magnum; Altele
lt-LT: Masalo dydžio klasė: Milžiniškas; Natūralaus dydžio; „Magnum“; „Mini“; Padidintas; Kojinė; Standartinis; „Super Magnum“; Kita
sk-SK: Veľkostná trieda návnady: Obrie; V životnej veľkosti; Magnum; Mini; Nadmerné veľkosti; Rukáv; Štandardné; Super Magnum; Iné
cs: Váhová/velikostní kategorie nástrahy/balabánu: Obří; Životní velikost; Magnum; Mini; Zvětšený; Rukávový; Standard; Super Magnum; Jiné
ru: Размерный класс манка: Гигантское; В натуральную величину; Магнум; Мини; Увеличенное; Флюгер-носок; Стандартное; Супермагнум; Другое
tr: Mühre boyut sınıfı: Dev; Gerçek boyut; Magnum; Mini; Büyük boy; Çorap; Standart; Süper Magnum; Diğer
pt-BR: Classe de tamanho da isca: Gigante; Tamanho real; Magnum; Mini; Superdimensionado; Meia (biruta); Padrão; Super Magnum; Outra
zh-CN: 假饵尺寸等级: 巨型; 实物大小; 大型; 迷你; 超大号; 袜式; 标准; 特大型; 其他
pl: Klasa rozmiaru wabika: Gigant; Naturalnej wielkości; Magnum; Mini; Powiększone; Skarpeta; Standardowe; Super Magnum; Inne
th: ขนาดของเหยื่อล่อ: ยักษ์; ขนาดเท่าตัวจริง; แมกนัม; มินิ; โอเวอร์ไซส์; ถุงลม; มาตรฐาน; ซูเปอร์แมกนัม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Klasa veličine mamca: Divovska veličina; Prirodna veličina; Magnum; Mini; Povećana veličina; Čarapa; Standardna veličina; Super Magnum; Ostalo
ko: 미끼 크기 등급: 자이언트; 실물 크기; 매그넘; 미니; 오버사이즈; 삭; 스탠다드; 슈퍼 매그넘; 기타
ja: デコイのサイズクラス: ジャイアント; 等身大; マグナム; ミニ; オーバーサイズ; ソック; スタンダード; スーパーマグナム; その他
hu: Csali méretosztálya: Óriás; Életnagyságú; Magnum; Mini; Túlméretes; Zsák; Normál; Super Magnum; Egyéb
it: Decoy taglia classe: Gigante; Grandezza naturale; Magnum; Mini; Extra large; A sacco; Standard; Super Magnum; Altro
en: Decoy size class: Giant; Life-size; Magnum; Mini; Oversize; Sock; Standard; Super Magnum; Other